District of Columbia statutes.
42-1310

Failure to comply.

A transfer subject to this chapter shall not be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with any provisions of this chapter.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 11, 46 DCR 2111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-960.